Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2209
Clerk of district court; required records enumerated.

(1) The clerk of the district court shall keep records, to be maintained on the court's electronic case management system, called the register of actions, the trial docket, the judge's docket notes, the financial record, the general index, the judgment index, and the case file. Retention and disposition of the records shall be determined by the State Records Administrator pursuant to the Records Management Act.

(2) The case file, numbered in chronological order, shall contain the complaint or petition and subsequent pleadings in the case file. The case file may be maintained as an electronic document through the court's electronic case management system, on microfilm, or in a paper volume and disposed of when determined by the State Records Administrator pursuant to the Records Management Act.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(a) Financial record means the financial accounting of the court, including the recording of all money receipted and disbursed by the court and the receipts and disbursements of all money held as an investment;

(b) General index means the alphabetical listing of the names of the parties to the suit, both direct and inverse, with the case number where all proceedings in such action may be found;

(c) Judge's docket notes means the notations of the judge detailing the actions in a court proceeding and the entering of orders and judgments;

(d) Judgment index means the alphabetical listing of all judgment debtors and judgment creditors;

(e) Register of actions means the official court record and summary of the case; and

(f) Trial docket means a list of pending cases as provided in section 25-2211.

R.S.1867, Code § 321, p. 448;

G.S.1873, c. 57, § 321, p. 579;

R.S.1913, § 8557;

C.S.1922, § 9508;

C.S.1929, § 20-2209;

R.S.1943, § 25-2209;

Laws 1971, LB 128, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 13;

Laws 2011, LB17, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 38.

Records Management Act, see section 84-1220.

Appearance docket is required to be kept by clerk of district court. Solomon v. A. W. Farney, Inc., 136 Neb. 338, 286 N.W. 254 (1939).

Failure of court in decree of confirmation to direct clerk to make entry on journal that court is satisfied of legality of such sale is not prejudicial where clerk had, in fact, made such entry. Erwin v. Brunke, 133 Neb. 745, 277 N.W. 48 (1938).

Satisfaction of judgment entered on appearance docket is not such as contemplated by law. Knaak v. Brown, 115 Neb. 260, 212 N.W. 431 (1927).

Court may order that paid judgment be canceled of record. Manker v. Sine, 47 Neb. 736, 66 N.W. 840 (1896).